Utah statutes.
75-1-402.   Notice -- Waiver.
A person, including a guardian ad litem, conservator, or other fiduciary, may
waive notice by a writing signed by him or his attorney and filed in the
proceeding. If there is no conflict of interest and no conservator or guardian
has been appointed, a parent may waive notice for his minor child.
